Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Child Support Enforcement Commission

15.290.
Establishment of Child Support Enforcement Commission. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 411, § 18, effective May 1, 1988; 1998, ch. 426, § 64, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 79, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 158, § 4, effective July 12, 2012; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.